Connecticut, session 2026, HB05408.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 27-102l of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) (1) The commissioner may appoint a manager to administer an
Office of Advocacy and Assistance for the aid and benefit of veterans
and their spouses, eligible dependents and family members. The office
shall have a staff of not less than nineteen men and women, including
not less than fourteen veterans' service officers, and not less than three
clerical personnel. The manager and veterans' service officers shall be
veterans, as defined in subsection (a) of section 27-103, or veterans who
were awarded the armed forces expeditionary medal for service by the
armed forces.
(2) (A) The manager shall develop a training module on (i) assisting
LCO No. 2047 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5408
and serving [women] veterans with regard to any available state or
federal services or benefits, and (ii) identifying and advising such
veterans of any community or nonprofit programs focused on assisting
and serving such veterans and of any other charitable or social service
organizations that may be able to provide assistance with services or
benefits. The manager shall dedicate a portion of such module to
assisting, serving and advising women veterans and to addressing
issues unique to women veterans. The manager shall hold and provide
instruction for an annual training session, in accordance with such
module, to each veterans' service officer and any member of a municipal
veterans advisory committee, director of municipal veterans services or
municipal veterans representative, as described in subsection (c) of
section 27-135, or representative from an Operation Academic Support
for Incoming Service Members center at a public institution of higher
education in this state.
(B) At least one of the veterans' service officers shall be a woman
having a demonstrated interest in the concerns of women veterans, who
shall be responsible for addressing those concerns, and, effective upon
the next opening of a veterans' service officer position occurring on or
after July 1, 2010, at least two of the veterans' service officers shall be
individuals having bilingual proficiency in English and Spanish, within
existing authorized positions. At least two of the veterans' service
officers shall, in addition to carrying out the duties under this section,
be responsible for overseeing and supporting municipalities'
compliance with the provisions of section 27-135. Each veterans' service
officer shall (i) successfully complete a course in veterans' benefits not
later than one year after commencement of employment, (ii) attend the
training session described in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, and
(iii) be assigned to one of the five congressional districts of the state.
(3) The office staff shall, at least twice annually, conduct a training
course for any member of a municipal veterans advisory committee,
director of municipal veterans services or municipal veterans
representative. The office staff shall include in such training course a
LCO No. 2047 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5408
summary of (A) state and federal services and benefits [,] for veterans,
community or nonprofit programs focused on assisting and serving
veterans and other charitable or social service organizations that may be
able to provide assistance with services or benefits, (B) the requirements
under section 27-135, and (C) any assistance the office staff may provide
to any such member, director or representative related to such
requirements.
(4) (A) The office shall develop a written outreach plan identifying (i)
strategies for conducting outreach to veterans and their spouses, eligible
dependents and family members for purposes of providing assistance
in claims for veterans' services or benefits, and (ii) to the extent possible,
specific events and other opportunities to provide such assistance that
are sponsored by the office or in which the office is participating. The
office shall update such written outreach plan as necessary to improve
the efficacy of its outreach efforts.
(B) The manager and each veterans' service officer shall electronically
track information relating to outreach conducted or attended by the
office, including, but not limited to, the title or type of any outreach
event conducted or attended and the number of veterans or their
spouses, eligible dependents or family members to whom substantive
services or referrals were provided.
(C) The office shall utilize the notifications received from the
administrator of each nursing home and assisted living facility in the
state, pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section, to
develop an annual schedule for each veterans' service officer to visit
nursing homes and assisted living facilities. The office shall compile any
information collected as a result of such visits and provide quarterly
reports on such information to the Board of Trustees for the Department
of Veterans Affairs.
(D) The office shall provide quarterly reports to the Board of Trustees
for the Department of Veterans Affairs on (i) concerns raised by veterans
LCO No. 2047 3 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5408
or their spouses, eligible dependents or family members, which
concerns shall be summarized by type, frequency and resolution, (ii)
petitions filed by veterans or their spouses, eligible dependents or
family members received by the commissioner under section 27-102l(d)-
54 of the regulations of Connecticut state agencies for the four preceding
months, and (iii) copies of any such petitions.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 27-102l(b)